Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-745
Commitment; discharge, recommitment, or bail.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the Governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant or bond, a judge or magistrate may discharge him or may recommit him for a further period not to exceed sixty days, or a judge or magistrate judge may again take bail for his appearance and surrender, as provided in section 29-744, but within a period not to exceed sixty days after the date of such new bond.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 17, p. 564.

The illegality of a prisoner's custody prior to the issuance of a rendition warrant from a sister state does not render the warrant void and unenforceable. Bell v. Janing, 188 Neb. 690, 199 N.W.2d 24 (1972).